West Virginia, session 2026, SB609.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GOVERNANCE. §18B-1-12. Rights of students to exemptions from compulsory immunizations. A student shall be exempt from a college, university, or vocational technical school’s compulsory immunizations upon the presentation to the student’s school of a certification signed by the student if he or she is 18 years of age or older or the student’s parent or legal guardian stating that they object to immunization based on sincerely held religious beliefs.